Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.400

Aquatic invasive species inspection and training.

(1) Money in the aquatic invasive species management account created in RCW 77.135.200 may be used by the Washington state patrol for aquatic invasive species inspection training and to inspect for the presence of aquatic invasive species on aquatic conveyances that are required to stop at a Washington state patrol port of entry weigh station.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in both RCW 77.08.010 and 77.135.010 apply throughout this section.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 17 s 102; 2014 c 202 s 306; 2011 c 171 s 8; 2011 c 169 s 3; 2007 c 350 s 1; 2005 c 464 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2014 c 202: See note following RCW 77.135.010.

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 464: See note following RCW 88.02.560.